Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1.3. Virginia Community Flood Preparedness Fund.

§ 10.1-603.24.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authority”
means the Virginia Resources Authority.

“Cost,”
as applied to any project financed under the provisions of this article, means the total of all costs incurred by the local government as reasonable and necessary for carrying out all works and undertakings necessary or incident to the accomplishment of any project.

“Department”
means the Virginia Department of Conservation and Recreation.

“Flood prevention or protection”
means the construction of hazard mitigation projects, acquisition of land, or implementation of land use controls that reduce or mitigate damage from coastal or riverine flooding.

“Flood prevention or protection study”
means the conduct of a hydraulic or hydrologic study of a flood plain with historic and predicted floods, the assessment of flood risk, and the development of strategies to prevent or mitigate damage from coastal or riverine flooding.

“Fund”
means the Virginia Community Flood Preparedness Fund created pursuant to §

10.1-603.25

.

“Local government”
means any county, city, town, municipal corporation, authority, district, commission, or political subdivision created by the General Assembly or pursuant to the Constitution of Virginia or laws of the Commonwealth.

“Low-income geographic area”
means any locality, or community within a locality, that has a median household income that is not greater than 80 percent of the local median household income, or any area in the Commonwealth designated as a qualified opportunity zone by the U.S. Secretary of the Treasury via his delegation of authority to the Internal Revenue Service.

“Nature-based solution”
means an approach that reduces the impacts of flood and storm events through the use of environmental processes and natural systems. A nature-based solution may provide additional benefits beyond flood control, including recreational opportunities and improved water quality.

History.

2016, c. 762; 2020, cc. 1199, 1219, 1254, 1280.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1199, 1219, 1254,
and 1280 substituted “Virginia Community Flood Preparedness Fund” for “Virginia Shoreline Resiliency Fund” in the Article 1.3 heading.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1199, 1219, 1254, and 1280 are identical, and inserted the definitions of “Flood prevention or protection,” “Flood prevention or protection study,” “Low-income geographic area” and “Nature-based solution”; in the definition of “Department,” substituted “Conservation and Recreation” for “Emergency Management” and in the definition of “Fund,” substituted “Virginia Community Flood Preparedness Fund created pursuant to §

10.1-603.25

” for “Virginia Shoreline Resiliency Fund.”

§ 10.1-603.25.
Virginia Community Flood Preparedness Fund; loan and grant program.

The Virginia Shoreline Resiliency Fund is hereby continued as a permanent and perpetual fund to be known as the Virginia Community Flood Preparedness Fund. All sums that are designated for deposit in the Fund from revenue generated by the sale of emissions allowances pursuant to subdivision C 1 of §

10.1-1330

, all sums that may be appropriated to the Fund by the General Assembly, all receipts by the Fund from the repayment of loans made by it to local governments, all income from the investment of moneys held in the Fund, and any other sums designated for deposit to the Fund from any source, public or private, including any federal grants and awards or other forms of assistance received by the Commonwealth that are eligible for deposit in the Fund under federal law, shall be designated for deposit to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including any appropriated funds and all principal, interest accrued, and payments, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. All loans and grants provided under this article shall be deemed to promote the public purposes of enhancing flood prevention or protection and coastal resilience.

Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of enhancing flood prevention or protection and coastal resilience as required by this article. The Authority shall manage the Fund and shall establish interest rates and repayment terms of such loans as provided in this article in accordance with a memorandum of agreement with the Department. The Authority may disburse from the Fund its reasonable costs and expenses incurred in the management of the Fund. The Department shall direct distribution of loans and grants from the Fund in accordance with the provisions of subsection D.

The Authority is authorized at any time and from time to time to pledge, assign, or transfer from the Fund or any bank or trust company designated by the Authority any or all of the assets of the Fund to be held in trust as security for the payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on any and all bonds, as defined in § 62.1-199, issued to finance any flood prevention or protection project undertaken pursuant to the provisions of this article. In addition, the Authority is authorized at any time and from time to time to sell upon such terms and conditions as the Authority deems appropriate any loan or interest thereon made pursuant to this article. The net proceeds of the sale remaining after payment of costs and expenses shall be designated for deposit to, and become part of, the Fund.

The Fund shall be administered by the Department as prescribed in this article. The Department, in consultation with the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources and the Special Assistant to the Governor for Coastal Adaptation and Protection, shall establish guidelines regarding the distribution and prioritization of loans and grants, including loans and grants that support flood prevention or protection studies of statewide or regional significance.

Localities shall use moneys from the Fund primarily for the purpose of implementing flood prevention and protection projects and studies in areas that are subject to recurrent flooding as confirmed by a locality-certified floodplain manager. Moneys in the Fund may be used to mitigate future flood damage and to assist inland and coastal communities across the Commonwealth that are subject to recurrent or repetitive flooding. No less than 25 percent of the moneys disbursed from the Fund each year shall be used for projects in low-income geographic areas. Priority shall be given to projects that implement community-scale hazard mitigation activities that use nature-based solutions to reduce flood risk.

Any locality is authorized to secure a loan made pursuant to this section by placing a lien up to the value of the loan against any property that benefits from the loan. Such a lien shall be subordinate to each prior lien on such property, except prior liens for which the prior lienholder executes a written subordination agreement, in a form and substance acceptable to the prior lienholder in its sole and exclusive discretion, that is recorded in the land records where the property is located.

Any locality using moneys in the Fund to provide a loan for a project in a low-income geographic area is authorized to forgive the principal of such loan. If a locality forgives the principal of any such loan, any obligation of the locality to repay that principal to the Commonwealth shall not be forgiven and such obligation shall remain in full force and effect. The total amount of loans forgiven by all localities in a fiscal year shall not exceed 30 percent of the amount appropriated in such fiscal year to the Fund by the General Assembly.

History.

2016, c. 762; 2020, cc. 1199, 1219, 1254, 1280; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1199 and 1254, cl. 2 provides: “That any moneys in the Virginia Shoreline Resiliency Fund as created by Chapter 762 of the Acts of Assembly of 2016 shall remain in the Virginia Community Flood Preparedness Fund pursuant to §

10.1-603.25

of the Code of Virginia, as amended and reenacted by this act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1219 and 1280, cl. 3 provides: “That any moneys in the Virginia Shoreline Resiliency Fund as created by Chapter 762 of the Acts of Assembly of 2016 shall remain in the Virginia Community Flood Preparedness Fund pursuant to §

10.1-603.25

of the Code of Virginia, as amended and reenacted by this act.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1199, 1219, 1254, and 1280 are nearly identical, and added subsection designations A through G, including adding subsections C, D, and G; in subsection A, rewrote the paragraph, which read, “There shall be set apart a permanent and perpetual fund, to be known as the Virginia Shoreline Resiliency Fund, consisting of such sums that may be appropriated to the Fund by the General Assembly, all receipts by the Fund from loans made by it to local governments, all income from the investment of moneys held in the Fund, and any other sums designated for deposit to the Fund from any source, public or private. The Fund shall be administered by the Department as prescribed in this article. The Department shall establish guidelines regarding the distribution of loans from the Fund and prioritization of such loans”; in subsection B, added the first and last sentences and in the second sentence, added “in accordance with a memorandum of agreement with the Department” at the end; in subsection E in the first sentence, substituted “implementing flood prevention and protection projects and studies in areas” for “creating a low-interest loan program to help residents and businesses”; in the second sentence, added “and to assist inland and coastal communities across the Commonwealth that are subject to recurrent or repetitive flooding” at the end and added the third and last sentences and in subsection F, substituted “pursuant to this section” for “through such a low-interest loan program” in the first sentence. Subsection A has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic” in subsection D.

§ 10.1-603.26.
Deposit of moneys; expenditures; investments.

All moneys in the Fund shall be deposited in an account or accounts in banks or trust companies organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or in national banking associations located in Virginia or in savings institutions located in Virginia organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or the United States. The moneys in these accounts shall be paid by check signed by the Executive Director of the Authority or other officers or employees designated by the Board of Directors of the Authority. All deposits of moneys shall, if required by the Authority, be secured in a manner determined by the Authority to be prudent, and all banks, trust companies, and savings institutions are authorized to give security for the deposits. Moneys in the Fund shall not be commingled with other moneys of the Authority. Moneys in the Fund not needed for immediate use or disbursement may be invested or reinvested by the Authority in obligations or securities that are considered lawful investments for public funds under the laws of the Commonwealth.

History.

2016, c. 762.

§ 10.1-603.27.
Annual audit.

The Auditor of Public Accounts, or his legally authorized representatives, shall annually audit the accounts of the Authority, and the cost of such audit services as shall be required shall be borne by the Authority. The audit shall be performed at least each fiscal year, in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and, accordingly, include such tests of the accounting records and such auditing procedures as are considered necessary under the circumstances. The Authority shall furnish copies of such audit to the Governor.

History.

2016, c. 762.